Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-302
Election.

Notice of the time and place of holding the election shall be given in the same manner, and the election shall be conducted in all respects the same as is provided by the law relating to general elections for county purposes. There shall be printed on the ballots the name of the city, town, village or place which is the present county seat, and the name of the one city, town, village or place to which it is proposed to move the county seat. The electors shall vote for one of the two places named on the ballot, and if the one place to which it is proposed to move the county seat shall receive three-fifths of all the votes cast at the election, such city, town, village or place shall become and remain the county seat of the county from and after the first day of the third month next succeeding such election. The question of relocation and division of any county within the state shall not be again submitted to the electors for the period of ten years from and after the date of any such election.

Laws 1917, c. 169, § 2, p. 380;

C.S.1922, § 846;

C.S.1929, § 25-302;

R.S.1943, § 22-302.